Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.0002

Transfer of board to department of corrections—Members of board shall exercise independent judgment.

(1) The indeterminate sentence review board is transferred to the department of corrections.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written materials in the possession of the indeterminate sentence review board shall be delivered to the custody of the department of corrections. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the indeterminate sentence review board shall be made available to the department of corrections. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the indeterminate sentence review board shall be assigned to the department of corrections.

(b) Any appropriations made to the indeterminate sentence review board shall, on August 24, 2011, be transferred and credited to the department of corrections.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the indeterminate sentence review board are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of corrections to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the indeterminate sentence review board shall be continued and acted upon by the department of corrections. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of corrections.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the indeterminate sentence review board shall not affect the validity of any act performed before August 24, 2011.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the indeterminate sentence review board assigned to the department of corrections under chapter 40, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of corrections shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

(8) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 40, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and despite the transfer of the indeterminate sentence review board to the department of corrections, the members of the indeterminate sentence review board will possess and shall exercise independent judgment when making any decisions concerning offenders. These decisions include, but are not limited to, decisions concerning offenders' release, revocation, reinstatement, or the imposition of conditions of supervision.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 16.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.